Utah statutes.
53A-16-111.   Payment of judgments and warrants -- Special tax.

A local school board shall levy a special tax:

(1)  if a judgment is obtained against the board; or

(2)  to pay warrants if there are no existing funds for the payment of warrants by the board to refund taxes.

